Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma PFAS-


Safe Biosolids and Farmland Protection Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-42 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:



Req. No. 3501 Page 1


1. “Agricultural land” means cropland, pasture, rangeland,


orchards, or other land used for growing food or feed crops or for


grazing or raising livestock;


2. “Biosolids” means treated sewage sludge derived from


municipal or domestic wastewater treatment plants that meets federal


and state criteria for land application to improve soil or fertilize


crops;


3. “Generator” means any publicly owned treatment works,


wastewater treatment facility, septage hauler, or other entity that


produces or manages human-derived biosolids or septage for land


application;


4. “Human manure” means sewage sludge, biosolids, or domestic


septage derived from human excreta and other domestic wastewater


streams intended for land application;


5. “Land application” means the placement or spreading of


biosolids, human manure, or septage on or into the soil surface or


subsoil of agricultural land for agronomic or soil-conditioning


purposes; and


6. “PFAS” means per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, including


but not limited to PFOA, PFOS, PFHxS, PFNA, PFHxA, and any


additional compounds designated by the Department of Environmental


Quality by rule.





Req. No. 3501 Page 2


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-43 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No human-derived biosolids or septage shall be land-applied


to agricultural land in this state unless the material has been


sampled and analyzed for PFAS by a laboratory accredited for PFAS in


solids using EPA Method 1633 or a successor method approved by the


Department of Environmental Quality.


B. Generators intending to land-apply biosolids or septage on


agricultural land shall:


1. Conduct PFAS testing at a minimum frequency based on annual


production volume, as specified by the Department of Environmental


Quality by rule, which shall be no less than once per year and no


more than once per month; and


2. Analyze, at a minimum, for PFOA, PFOS, PFHxS, PFNA, and any


other PFAS compounds designated by the Department of Environmental


Quality.


C. Test results shall be reported to the Department of


Environmental Quality and made available to landowners and operators


of receiving agricultural land prior to any land application event.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-44 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 3501 Page 3


A. The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish a


tiered PFAS concentration framework for biosolids and septage


intended for land application, modeled on approaches adopted in


other states, including but not limited to “unrestricted”,


“restricted”, “conditional”, and “prohibited” categories.


B. Until rules and procedures are adopted, the following


interim tiers shall apply based on the sum of PFOA and PFOS in


biosolids or septage, which shall be measured on a dry weight basis:


1. Tier 1: Less than twenty micrograms per kilogram (20 μg/kg)


total PFOA plus PFOS. Land application on agricultural land shall


be permitted in accordance with existing biosolids regulations, with


no additional PFAS-related restrictions beyond routine monitoring;


2. Tier 2: Twenty to fifty micrograms per kilogram (20 to 50


μg/kg) total PFOA plus PFOS. Land application on agricultural land


shall be permitted only at reduced application rates determined by


the Department of Environmental Quality, with written notice to the


receiving landowner, operator, and local conservation district;


3. Tier 3: Greater than fifty to one hundred micrograms per


kilogram (50 to 100 μg/kg) total PFOA plus PFOS. Land application


on agricultural land shall be subject to strict rate limits,


enhanced recordkeeping, and implementation of a source


identification and reduction plan for upstream PFAS sources. The


Department of Environmental Quality may further restrict or suspend


land application under this tier based on local conditions; and

Req. No. 3501 Page 4


4. Tier 4: Greater than one hundred micrograms per kilogram


(100 μg/kg) total PFOA plus PFOS. Land application on agricultural


land shall be prohibited. Generators shall utilize alternative


disposal or treatment methods authorized by the Department of


Environmental Quality, and a source identification and reduction


plan shall be mandatory.


C. The Department of Environmental Quality may adopt more


protective tier thresholds, additional PFAS analytes, or total PFAS


metrics by rule based on emerging science, EPA guidance, or state


risk assessments.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-45 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Before any land application of human-derived biosolids or


septage, the generator or applicator shall provide the landowner and


farm operator with:


1. The most recent PFAS test results, including concentrations


of each analyte measured; and


2. Written identification of the applicable tier under Section


of this act and any associated restrictions.


B. Land application shall not occur on agricultural land unless


the landowner or authorized operator has provided written consent


acknowledging receipt of PFAS test results and tier information.



Req. No. 3501 Page 5


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-46 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation


with the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry,


shall adopt additional safeguards for land application of biosolids


on land used for:


1. Production of food crops for direct human consumption;


2. Production of animal feed, including hay and pasture; and


3. Grazing of livestock.


B. Such safeguards may include:


1. Additional PFAS testing of soil, forage, or milk where


biosolids have been applied;


2. Use restrictions, holding periods, or crop limitations


following land application; and


3. Prohibitions on land application in sensitive areas such as


wellhead protection zones and shallow groundwater regions.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-47 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Generators and applicators shall maintain records of PFAS


testing, land application locations, dates, rates, and receiving


landowner information for a period of at least ten (10) years.



Req. No. 3501 Page 6


B. The Department of Environmental Quality shall maintain a


publicly accessible online database of:


1. Registered biosolids generators and applicators;


2. Summary PFAS test results; and


3. General locations of agricultural land where biosolids have


been applied at a mapped or township-range level.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-48 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Department of Environmental Quality may issue orders,


suspend or revoke permits, and assess civil penalties for violations


of this act or rules adopted under it, including land application


without required PFAS testing, land application above authorized


tiers, or falsification of test results. Each day of noncompliance


and each discrete land application event in violation of this act


may be treated as a separate violation for purposes of penalties.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-49 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Environmental Quality Board is authorized and directed to


promulgate rules necessary to implement this act, including but not


limited to rules regarding test frequency, additional PFAS analytes,


tier thresholds, application rate formulas, and coordination with


federal regulations and guidance.

Req. No. 3501 Page 7


SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3501 YG 1/15/2026 1:33:07 PM











































Req. No. 3501 Page 8